District of Columbia statutes.
47-919

Disposition of monies collected.

All monies collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the Treasury of the District of Columbia to the credit of the General Fund; provided, that 15% of the monies collected under this chapter shall be deposited into the Housing Production Trust Fund established by § 42-2802; and provided further that 85% of the monies collected from Lots 836, 837 and 855 in Square 37 (or such successor record or assessment and taxation lots as may be created through future subdivision or creation of condominium units), shall be deposited in the West End Library and Fire Station Maintenance Fund established by [§ 1-325.181].

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-92, § 419, 27 DCR 3390
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 502(a), 49 DCR 1468
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-368, § 7, 58 DCR 991
1981 Ed., § 47-919.
D.C. Law 14-114 substituted “General Fund; provided, that 15% of the monies collected under this chapter shall be deposited into the Housing Production Trust Fund established by § 42-2802” for “General Fund”.
D.C. Law 18-368 substituted “Trust Fund established by § 42-2802; and provided further that 85% of the monies collected from Lots 836, 837 and 855 in Square 37 (or such successor record or assessment and taxation lots as may be created through future subdivision or creation of condominium units), shall be deposited in the West End Library and Fire Station Maintenance Fund established by § 1-325.181 ” for “Trust Fund established by § 42-2802”.